Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1524
Program; requirements.

Each community lifespan respite services program established pursuant to section 68-1523 shall:

(1) Involve key local individuals and agencies in the community lifespan respite services program planning process; and

(2) Create an advisory committee to advise the community lifespan respite services program on how the program may best serve the needs of families and caregivers of individuals unable to care for themselves. Other members shall include respite services providers, representatives of local service agencies, consumers, and other community representatives. Committee membership shall represent senior citizens, individuals with special needs, and families at risk of abuse and neglect.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 5.